New Jersey, session 221, A5197.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-129) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: "Account holder" means a resident of this State over age [18] 21 who establishes an account pursuant to this act through which account wagers are placed. "Account wagering" means a form of parimutuel wagering in which an account holder may deposit money in an account with the account wagering licensee and then use the account balance to pay for parimutuel wagers by the account holder. "Account wagering licensee" means the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority or its assignee, provided that the commission has granted its approval for the authority to establish an account wagering system as provided for in this act. "Account wagering system" means the system through which account wagers are processed by the account wagering licensee pursuant to this act. "Applicant" means the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority or another entity that submits an application to the commission for a license to establish and conduct an off-track wagering facility pursuant to this act. "Authority" means the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority created by section 4 of P.L.1971, c.137 (C.5:10-4). "Backstretch Benevolency" means the Backstretch Benevolency Programs Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1993, c.15 (C.5:5-44.8). "Breeders and Stallions" means the distribution from the special trust account created pursuant to section 46 a. (2) of P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-66) for the purposes of subparagraph (c) of that citation. "Breeding and Development" means the New Jersey Horse Breeding and Development Account established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1967, c.40 (C.5:5-88). "Commission" means the New Jersey Racing Commission created by section 1 of P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-22). "Executive Director" means the Executive Director of the commission. "Health and Welfare" means moneys distributed to the Standardbred Breeders' and Owners' Association for the administration of a health benefits program pursuant to section 46 a. (5) of P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-66). "In-State host track" means a racetrack within this State which is operated by a permit holder which conducts a horse race upon which account wagers are placed pursuant to this act. "In-State sending track" means a racetrack within this State which is operated by a permit holder and is equipped to conduct off-track simulcasting. "In-State track" means an in-State host track or an in-State sending track. "Interstate common pool" means the parimutuel pool established within this State or in another state or foreign nation within which is combined parimutuel pools of one or more receiving tracks located in one or more states or foreign nations upon a race at an out-of-State sending track or out-of-State host track for the purpose of establishing payoff prices in the various jurisdictions. "Jockey's Health and Welfare" means a health and welfare trust established by the organization certified by the New Jersey Racing Commission as representing a majority of the active licensed thoroughbred jockeys in New Jersey for the purpose of providing health and welfare benefits to active, disabled and retired New Jersey jockeys and their dependents based upon reasonable criteria by that organization. "New Jersey Racing Industry Special Fund" means the fund established pursuant to section 27 of this act. "New Jersey Thoroughbred Horsemen's Association" means the association representing the majority of New Jersey thoroughbred owners and trainers responsible for receiving and distributing funds for programs designed to aid thoroughbred horsemen. "Off-track simulcasting" means the simultaneous audio or visual transmission of horse races conducted at in-State and out-of-State racetracks to off-track wagering facilities and parimutuel wagering at those off-track wagering facilities on the results of those races. "Off-track wagering" means parimutuel wagering at an off-track wagering facility as authorized under this act. "Off-track wagering facility" means a licensed facility, other than a racetrack, at which parimutuel wagering is conducted pursuant to this act. "Off-track wagering licensee" means the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority or its assignee, or another entity to which the commission has granted its approval to conduct an off-track wagering facility as provided for in this act. "Out-of-State host track" means a racetrack in a jurisdiction other than the State of New Jersey, the operator of which is lawfully permitted to conduct a horse race meeting and which conducts horse races upon which account wagers may be placed pursuant to this act. "Out-of-State sending track" means a racetrack in a jurisdiction other than the State of New Jersey which is equipped to conduct off-track simulcasting and the operator of which is lawfully permitted to conduct a horse race meeting and to provide simulcast horse races to off-track wagering facilities in this State. "Out-of-State track" means an out-of-State host track or an out-of-State sending track. "Outstanding parimutuel ticket" means a winning parimutuel ticket which is not claimed within 12 months of sale. "Parimutuel" means any system whereby wagers with respect to the outcome of a horse race are placed with, or in, a wagering pool conducted by an authorized person, and in which the participants are wagering with each other and not against the person conducting the wagering pool. "Participation agreement" means the written contract entered into prior to the effective date of P.L.2011, c.26, that provides for the establishment or implementation of either (a) an off-track wagering facility or facilities or (b) an account wagering system.  Each such contract shall set forth the manner in which the off-track wagering facility or facilities or the account wagering system shall be managed, operated and capitalized, as well as how expenses and revenues shall be allocated and distributed by and among the authority and the other eligible participants subject to the agreement. "Permit holder" means the holder of an annual permit to conduct a horse race meeting issued by the commission. "Racetrack" means the physical facility where a permit holder conducts a horse race meeting with parimutuel wagering. "Racing costs" means the prospective and actual costs for all licensing, investigation, operation, regulation, supervision and enforcement activities and functions performed by the commission. "Simulcast horse races" means horse races conducted at an in-State sending track or an out-of-State sending track, as the case may be, and transmitted simultaneously by picture to a receiving track or an off-track wagering facility. "Sire Stakes" means the Sire Stakes Program established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1971, c.85 (C.5:5-91). "Standardbred Drivers' Health and Welfare" means a health and welfare trust established by the Standardbred Breeders' and Owners' Association of New Jersey for the purpose of providing health and welfare benefits to active, disabled and retired New Jersey standardbred drivers and their dependents based upon reasonable criteria by that organization. "Takeout" means that portion of a wager which is deducted from or not included in the parimutuel pool, and which is distributed other than to persons placing wagers. "Thoroughbred Breeders and Stallions" means the special trust account created pursuant to section 46 b.(1)(e) of P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-66). (cf: P.L.2021, c.89, s.3) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-131) is amended to read as follows: 5. a. At the time of filing an application for an off-track wagering license, the applicant shall submit to the commission a non-refundable filing fee in an amount established by regulation by the commission, and a certification in a form prescribed by the commission which specifies, but is not limited to, the following information: (1)   a plan depicting the proposed facility and improvements thereon, including information about the size, seating capacity, parking and services to be provided at the facility; (2)   the location of the proposed facility, and relevant demographic or other information concerning the municipality and surrounding area where the proposed facility is to be located; (3)   the number of permanent and part-time jobs expected to be created at the proposed facility, and gross revenues expected to be generated by the facility; (4)   the fire evacuation plan for the proposed facility; (5)   the type of food and beverages available, which shall include the provision of first-class dining facilities; and (6)   such other information as the commission may require. b.    The applicant shall file a separate application and certification for each proposed off-track wagering facility. c.     The commission shall charge each off-track wagering licensee an annual fee in connection with the renewal of the off-track wagering license, and shall establish by regulation procedures and conditions for renewal of licenses issued under this act.  The amount of the annual license renewal fee shall be used by the commission to cover commission expenses associated with implementation of the provisions of this act, P.L.2001, c.199, and shall reasonably reflect those costs. d.    The commission shall by regulation establish the maximum hours of operation of off-track wagering facilities. e. (1) Notwithstanding R.S.33:1-42, priority for the service of alcoholic beverages for on-premise consumption at an off-track wagering facility shall be given to a Class C plenary retail consumption licensee, by an agreement or contract with the off-track wagering licensee, pursuant to the provisions of R.S.33:1-1 et seq. in accordance with such procedures as established by statute and by regulation of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control.  When a Class C plenary retail consumption license or licensee is available in the municipality, the authority shall not hold a license to provide alcoholic beverages at an off-track wagering facility.  However, when a Class C plenary retail consumption licensee or license is not available in the municipality, the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall issue a special concessionaire permit to the authority for the provision of alcoholic beverages at the off-track wagering facility and, if the off-track wagering license is held by an off-track wagering licensee other than the authority, the director may issue a non-transferable special license to provide alcoholic beverages at the off-track wagering facility pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. (2)   The Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control may issue one special license to an individual, corporation, or other type of legal entity to serve alcoholic beverages at an off-track wagering facility located in the municipality where a Class C plenary retail consumption licensee was not available to provide alcoholic beverages at the off-track wagering facility pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.  The license shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for immediate consumption on the premises of the off-track wagering facility.  The director may issue not more than 15 licenses pursuant to this paragraph.  Furthermore, licenses issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to the following requirements: (a)   No person who would fail to qualify as a licensee under Title 33 of the Revised Statutes shall be permitted to hold an interest in a special license under the provisions of this paragraph; (b)   Licenses shall be subject to the provisions of Title 33 of the Revised Statutes and rules and regulations promulgated by the director, to the extent those provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this act; (c)   No license issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be transferred to any other premises; (d)   Application for the initial issuance and renewal of each license shall be made to the director on an annual basis.  The fee for the initial issuance of the license shall be the average sale price for the three most recent sales of plenary retail consumption licenses in the municipality where the license is being issued during the preceding five years.  If the off-track wagering facility is located within the boundaries of two or more municipalities, the highest average sale price of the two or more municipalities shall be used.  If less than three plenary retail consumption licenses have been sold in the municipality or municipalities, as the case may be, within the previous five years, the director shall obtain an appraisal, at the applicant's expense, to determine the appropriate fee for the license.  The appraisal process shall include an examination of previous transactions in the municipality or municipalities, as the case may be, and shall reflect what a willing buyer, under no pressure to buy, would pay a willing seller, under no pressure to sell, for a plenary retail consumption license in that municipality or municipalities, as the case may be. One half of the amount of the application fee for the initial issuance of the license shall be paid upon the issuance of the license and the other half of that amount shall be paid one year later.  The director shall establish an annual fee for the license which shall not exceed the fee which may be imposed by a municipality for a plenary retail consumption license pursuant to R.S.33:1-12, a portion of which shall be paid by the director to the New Jersey Racing Commission for the funding of horse breeding incentive programs; (e)   The fee for the initial issuance of the license shall be distributed in the following manner: (i)    Twenty-five percent shall be paid to the municipality where the off-track wagering facility is located and if the off-track wagering facility is located within the boundaries of two or more municipalities, the fee shall be divided equally among those municipalities; (ii)   Twenty-five percent shall be paid to the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control; (iii) Fifty percent shall be paid to the New Jersey Racing Commission for the funding of horse breeding incentive programs; (f)   The individual corporation or entity holding the license shall not be entitled to sell a license issued pursuant to this paragraph, and the license shall expire upon the closure of the off-track wagering facility; (g)   The director shall not issue a special concessionaire permit for any off-track wagering facility or premises which is eligible to obtain a license to serve alcoholic beverages under the provisions of this paragraph; and (h)   Pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the director shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this paragraph. (3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control to issue a special concessionaire permit or a special license described in paragraph (2) of this subsection to the authority pursuant to this act, P.L.2001, c.199, or to issue a special license to any individual, corporation, or other type of legal entity to serve alcoholic beverages in a municipality that prohibits the retail sale of alcoholic beverages within its boundaries. f.     Persons under the age of [18] 21 years shall not be permitted in any off-track wagering facility, except in dining areas if accompanied by a parent or guardian. g.    The commission shall by regulation establish minimum standards for off-track wagering facilities and timelines for their establishment and completion, including, but not limited to, standards for quality, size, seating capacity, the provision of first-class dining facilities, parking and services to be provided, as well as expected dates of construction, renovations and opening.  The failure of an off-track wagering licensee to meet these standards shall be sufficient cause for the commission to revoke, suspend or refuse to renew a license pursuant to the provisions of section 8 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-134). h.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an off-track wagering facility shall be a permitted use in all commercial and industrial districts of a municipality. i.     In evaluating an application for an off-track wagering license, the commission shall consider the proximity of the applicant's proposed site to other planned or existing off-track wagering facilities and to racetracks in this State.  If, in the opinion of the commission, the establishment of the facility at its proposed location would be inimical to the interests of another planned or established off-track wagering facility, or to a State racetrack, the commission shall require the applicant to consider alternative sites for the proposed facility. (cf: P.L.2011, c.26, s.4) 3.    Section 16 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-142) is amended to read as follows: 16. a. A person shall not place an account wager except in accordance with this act through the account wagering licensee, and no entity, other than the account wagering licensee, shall accept an account wager except as permitted by P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-127 et seq.).  A person may not place an account wager unless the person has established an account with the account wagering licensee.  To establish a wagering account, a person shall be a New Jersey resident at least [18] 21 years of age.  A resident of this State who has established an account with an account wagering licensee may place an account wager through the licensee while physically present in New Jersey, or while physically present in another jurisdiction if placing such a wager is not inconsistent with the law of that jurisdiction or with federal law. b.    The account shall be in the name of a natural person and may not be in the name of any beneficiary, custodian, joint trust, corporation, partnership or other organization or entity. c.     An account may be established by a person completing an application form approved by the commission and submitting it together with a certification, or other proof, of age and residency. The form shall include the address of the principal residence of the prospective account holder and a statement that a false statement made in regard to an application may subject the applicant to prosecution. d.    The prospective account holder shall submit the completed application to the account wagering licensee, to any account wagering participating permit holder or to a licensed off-track wagering facility or such other person or entity as may be approved by the commission. The account wagering licensee may accept or reject an application after receipt and review of the application and certification, or other proof, of age and residency for compliance with this act. e.     Any prospective account holder who provides false or misleading information on the application is subject to rejection of the application or cancellation of the account by the account wagering licensee without notice. f.     The account wagering licensee shall have the right to suspend or close any wagering account at its discretion. g.    Any person not in good standing with the commission shall not be entitled to maintain a wagering account. h.    The address provided by the applicant in the application shall be deemed the proper address for the purposes of mailing checks, account withdrawals, notices and other materials. i.     A wagering account shall not be assignable or otherwise transferable. j.     Except as otherwise provided in this act or in regulations which the commission may adopt hereunder, all account wagers shall be final and no wager shall be canceled by the account holder at any time after the wager has been accepted by the account wagering licensee. k.    For the purposes of this act and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all messages or orders to place account wagers received by the licensee on behalf of a participating permit holder shall be deemed made to a place within this State. l.     All persons accepting account wagers on behalf of the account wagering licensee shall do so at a location within this State. m.   The account wagering licensee may at any time declare the system closed for receiving any wagers on any race or closed for all wagering. (cf: P.L.2020, c.119, s.1) 4.    Section 7 of P.L.2011, c.15 (C.5:5-174) is amended to read as follows: 7. a. A person within this State shall not be permitted to open an exchange wagering account, or place an exchange wager through the exchange wagering system, except in accordance with federal law and this act, and through the exchange wagering licensee, and no entity, other than the exchange wagering licensee, shall accept an exchange wager from a person within this State.  A person may not place an exchange wager unless the person has established an exchange wagering account with the exchange wagering licensee. To establish an exchange wagering account, a person shall be at least [18] 21 years of age, and a resident of this State, except that any person on the self-exclusion list established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2002, c.89 (C.5:5-65.1) shall be prohibited from establishing an exchange wagering account. b.    The exchange wagering account shall be in the name of a natural person and may not be in the name of any beneficiary, custodian, joint trust, corporation, partnership or other organization or entity. c.     An exchange wagering account may be established in person, by mail, telephone, or other electronic media, by a person completing an application form approved by the commission. The form shall include the address of the principal residence of the prospective exchange wagering account holder and a statement that a false statement made in regard to an application may subject the applicant to prosecution.  The exchange wagering licensee must verify the identification, residence, and age of the exchange wagering account holder using methods and technologies approved by the commission. d.    The prospective exchange wagering account holder shall submit the completed application in person, by mail, telephone, or other electronic media, including the Internet and wireless devices, to the exchange wagering licensee or such other person or entity as may be approved by the commission.  The exchange wagering licensee may accept or reject an application after receipt and review of the application and certification, or other proof, of age and residency for compliance with this act. e.     Any prospective exchange wagering account holder who provides false or misleading information on the application is subject to rejection of the application or cancellation of the exchange wagering account by the exchange wagering licensee without notice. f.     The exchange wagering licensee shall have the right to suspend or close any exchange wagering account at its discretion. g.    Any person not in good standing with the commission shall not be entitled to maintain an exchange wagering account. h.    The address provided by the applicant in the application shall be deemed the proper address for the purposes of mailing checks, exchange wagering account withdrawals, notices and other materials. i.     An exchange wagering account shall not be assignable or otherwise transferable. j.     The exchange wagering licensee may cancel or allow to be cancelled, any unmatched wagers, without cause, at any time.  Except as otherwise provided in this act or in regulations which the commission may adopt hereunder, all matched wagers shall be final and no wager shall be canceled by the exchange wagering account holder at any time after the wager has been matched by the exchange wagering licensee. k.    The commission may prescribe rules governing when an exchange wagering licensee may cancel or void a matched wager or part of a matched wager, and the actions which an exchange wagering licensee may take when all or part of a matched wager is cancelled or voided.  Such rules may include, but are not limited to, permitting the exchange wagering licensee to place corrective wagers under circumstances approved in the rules adopted by the commission. l.     The exchange wagering licensee may at any time declare the exchange wagering system closed for receiving any wagers on any race or closed for all exchange wagering. (cf: P.L.2011, c.15, s.7) 5.    Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.228 (C.5:5-186) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Off-Track and Account Wagering Act," P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-127 et seq.), or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Racing Commission shall implement a pilot program to license a lessee or purchaser of a State-owned racetrack to provide patrons with the ability to place wagers on horse races through electronic wagering terminals to be located at a limited number of eligible taverns, restaurants, and similar venues where food, alcoholic beverages, or both, are served to the public for on-premises consumption, subject to regulation and control by the commission and as further provided by this act, P.L.2011, c.228 (C.5:5-186). a.     In lieu of a maximum of one off-track wagering facility license that remains to be utilized or implemented by the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority or any lessee of the authority under the "Off-Track and Account Wagering Act," P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-127 et seq.), as amended and supplemented, the commission shall issue one license to be awarded to an entity that has entered into an agreement with the authority for the sale or lease of a State-owned racetrack for the establishment at not more than 12 qualified taverns, restaurants, and similar venues, of not more than 20 electronic wagering terminals in total in this State to enable patrons to place wagers on in-State and out-of-State horse races, which wagers shall be placed by eligible patrons who are physically present at those locations.  Only one license shall be issued under this pilot program, except that the licensed entity may enter into an agreement with another licensed entity that has also entered into an agreement with the authority for the sale or lease of a State-owned racetrack, to jointly undertake and share the proceeds from the licensed activities under the pilot program, which agreement shall be subject to the approval of the authority.  The license issued under this pilot program shall be temporary, subject to review and renewal on an annual basis, and shall expire within three years of issuance of the initial license.  When issuing the license, the commission shall require the licensed entity to sign a waiver showing that the licensee understands the terms and conditions of the license. b.    The pilot program authorized pursuant to this act, P.L.2011, c.228 (C.5:5-186), shall be implemented only in the northern part of the State, in Bergen, Hudson, Essex, Passaic, Union, Morris, Somerset, Hunterdon, Warren, Sussex, and northern Middlesex and Ocean counties.  The commission shall develop an application form and process, solicit completed applications to be submitted jointly by a lessee or purchaser of a State-owned racetrack and that entity's selected taverns, restaurants, and similar venues located within the aforementioned geographic region, and evaluate each applicant's eligibility using specified criteria which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   proof of financial resources sufficient to enable the applicant to establish and conduct the electronic wagering terminals with appropriately staffed and managed operations; (2)   evidence of good character, honesty, competency and integrity; (3)   the absence of a conviction for a crime involving fraud, dishonesty or moral turpitude; and (4)   any additional standards and criteria the commission may establish by rule or regulation. In evaluating an application for a license, the commission shall ensure that each selected applicant has met all required eligibility criteria.  In awarding the license, the commission shall also consider the proximity of the applicant's venue to planned or existing racetracks, off-track wagering facilities, and simulcasting facilities in this State.  If, in the opinion of the commission, the issuance of a license for the establishment of electronic wagering terminals at the applicant's venue would be inimical to the interests of a planned or established racetrack, off-track wagering facility, or simulcasting facility, the commission shall deny the license even when the applicant has otherwise met all eligibility criteria. A license issued under this section shall at all times remain the property of the permit holder and shall be subject to all conditions of a participation agreement pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-130), as amended and supplemented.  The permit holder shall be responsible for entering into agreements with qualified taverns, restaurants and similar venues. The permit holder and qualified tavern, restaurant or similar venue shall jointly submit to the commission any applications and information as required by the commission in determining eligibility for a license.  The permit holder may terminate agreements for individual licenses with notice to the commission. c.     To effectuate the provisions of this act, P.L.2011, c.228 (C.5:5-186), the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to: (1)   determine the number of locations at which electronic wagering terminals shall be established under the program, provided that the license shall be limited to a maximum of 12 locations, which maximum number of locations shall be reduced by one per each off-track wagering facility in the authority's share that is newly-established during the implementation of the pilot program, and provided further that not more than 20 electronic wagering terminals shall be established in total in this State; (2)   evaluate the types of electronic wagering terminals and equipment that may be used in wagering, and the number of such machines to be established at each licensed venue, subject to approval by the commission; (3)   develop geographic proximity and impact criteria to determine whether a proposed location would be inimical to the interest of planned or existing racetracks, off-track wagering facilities, and simulcasting facilities in this State, and which criteria shall be used to deny a license as provided under subsection b. of this section; (4)   authorize the licensee to enter into contracts with vendors, operators, and other entities, as the case may be, for the establishment and operation of the approved electronic wagering terminals; (5)   ensure that amounts wagered through the electronic wagering terminals are properly distributed to winning bettors, the licensed venue, and others in a manner similar to that provided under section 44 of P.L.1940, c.17 (C.5:5-64), section 21 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-147) for sums wagered on in-State races, and sections 22 through 25 of P.L.2001, c.199 (C.5:5-148 through C.5:5-151) for sums wagered on out-of-State races, except that a local impact fee of 1% of the licensee's share of revenues shall be paid to the host municipality for general municipal purposes; (6)   provide that an amount of the revenues from electronic wagering terminals shall be distributed for the funding of horse racing purses in accordance with the statutes cited under paragraph (5) of this subsection; (7)   ensure that persons under the age of [18] 21 years shall not be permitted within the space in the venue where electronic wagering terminals are placed, and that necessary safeguards are in place to prevent minors from wagering; and (8)   regulate any other aspects of the electronic wagering operation the commission deems appropriate. d.    Notwithstanding any other provision of this act or the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the commission shall, within 90 days of the effective date of this act and after notice provided in accordance with this subsection, authorize the temporary adoption of any rule concerning the conduct of wagering under this act, P.L.2011, c.228 (C.5:5-186). Any temporary rulemaking authorized by this subsection shall be subject to such terms and conditions as the commission may deem appropriate.  Notice of any temporary rulemaking action taken by the commission pursuant to this subsection shall be published in the New Jersey Register, and provided to the newspapers designated by the commission pursuant to subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-8), at least seven days prior to the implementation of the temporary rules.  Nothing herein shall be deemed to require the publication of the text of any temporary rule adopted by the commission or notice of any modification of any temporary rulemaking initiated in accordance with this subsection. The text of any temporary rule adopted by the commission shall be available in each venue participating in the temporary rulemaking and shall be available upon request from the commission.  The temporary rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall not be effective for more than 180 days unless promulgated in accordance with normal rule-making procedures. e.     Within three years of the issuance of the license under the pilot program, the commission shall issue a report to the Governor, and to the Legislature as provided under section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), containing an evaluation of the pilot program. The report shall also provide the commission's opinion as to whether the pilot program should be continued and, if so, recommendations for further improvement and implementation.  The pilot program shall end upon the expiration of the license issued under the program unless the Legislature enacts a law to continue the program. (cf: P.L.2011, c.228, s.1) 6.    Section 8 of P.L.2021, c.193 (C.5:5-197) is amended to read as follows: 8. a. A person within this State shall not be permitted to open a fixed odds wagering account, or place a fixed odds wager through the fixed odds wagering system, except in accordance with federal law and this act, and through the fixed odds wagering licensee, and no entity, other than the fixed odds wagering licensee, shall accept a fixed odds wager from a person within this State.  A person may not place a fixed odds wager unless the person has established a fixed odds wagering account with the fixed odds wagering licensee and is physically present in New Jersey at the time of placing the account wager, except that persons physically present at a racetrack or off-track wagering facility may place a wager through a teller at a window without opening a fixed odds wagering account. To establish a fixed odds wagering account, a person shall be physically present in New Jersey at the time of establishing the wagering account, at least [18] 21 years of age, except that any person on the self-exclusion list established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2002, c.89 (C.5:5-65.1) shall be prohibited from establishing a fixed odds wagering account.  A resident of this State who has established an account with a fixed odds wagering licensee may place a fixed odds wager through the licensee while physically present in New Jersey, or while physically present in another jurisdiction if placing such a wager is not inconsistent with the law of that jurisdiction or with federal law.  The division shall develop protocols to accurately determine a person's location within the State to effectuate the provisions of this subsection. b.    The fixed odds wagering account shall be in the name of a natural person and may not be in the name of any beneficiary, custodian, joint trust, corporation, partnership, or other organization or entity. c.     A fixed odds wagering account may be established in person, by mail, telephone, or other electronic media, by a person completing an application form approved by the division. The form shall include the address of the principal residence of the prospective fixed odds wagering account holder and a statement that a false statement made in regard to an application may subject the applicant to prosecution.  The fixed odds wagering licensee shall verify the identification, residence, and age of the fixed odds wagering account holder using methods and technologies approved by the division. d.    The prospective fixed odds wagering account holder shall submit the completed application in person, by mail, telephone, or other electronic media, including the Internet and wireless devices, to the fixed odds wagering licensee or such other person or entity as may be approved by the division.  The fixed odds wagering licensee may accept or reject an application after receipt and review of the application and certification, or other proof, of age and residency for compliance with this act. e.     Any prospective fixed odds wagering account holder who provides false or misleading information on the application is subject to rejection of the application or cancellation of the fixed odds wagering account by the fixed odds wagering licensee without notice. f.     The fixed odds wagering licensee shall have the right to suspend or close any fixed odds wagering account at its discretion. g.    Any person not in good standing with the division shall not be entitled to maintain a fixed odds wagering account. h.    The address provided by the applicant in the application shall be deemed the proper address for the purposes of mailing checks, fixed odds wagering account withdrawals, notices, and other materials. i.     A fixed odds wagering account shall not be assignable or otherwise transferable. j.     The fixed odds wagering licensee may at any time declare the fixed odds wagering system closed for receiving any wagers on any race or closed for all fixed odds wagering. (cf: P.L.2021, c.193, s.8) 7.    (New section)  Any account opened for the purpose of wagering on horse races pursuant to any provision of law, rule, or regulation and held by an account holder who is under the age of 21 on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be frozen and no wager shall be accepted from such account until such time as the account holder attains the age of 21. The account holder shall be entitled to a full refund of all monies held in the account as of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and shall receive such refund within 30 days of the effective date of P.L    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 8.    Section 15 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-15) is amended to read as follows: 15.  No ticket or share shall be sold to any person under the age of [18] 21, but this  shall not be deemed to prohibit the purchase of a ticket or share for the  purpose of making a gift by a person [18] 21 years of age or older to a person less  than that age.  Any licensee who knowingly sells or offers to sell a lottery ticket or share to any person under the age of [18] 21 is a disorderly person. (cf: P.L.1970, c.13, s.15) 9.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.